Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 6. Telemedicine Business Registry.

Sec. 44.33.381.
Telemedicine business registry.

The department shall adopt regulations for establishing and maintaining a registry of businesses performing telemedicine services in the state.

The department shall maintain the registry of businesses performing telemedicine services in the state. The registry must include the name, address, and contact information of businesses performing telemedicine services in the state.

In this section,

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“telemedicine services” means the delivery of health care services using the transfer of medical data through audio, visual, or data communications that are performed over two or more locations by a provider who is physically separated from the recipient of the health care services.

History.

(§ 38 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 38, ch. 25, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on September 19, 2016.